Massachusetts, session 194th, H3172.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by
section 100 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by adding the
following paragraph:-
(s) “Tipped wage”, a sum of money, including any amount designated by a credit card
patron, a gift or a gratuity, given as an acknowledgment of any service performed by a wait staff
employee, service employee or service bartender.
SECTION 2. Paragraph (b) of part B of section 3 of said chapter 62, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subparagraph:-
(6) An amount equal to the tipped wages earned by the taxpayer within the taxable year.
of 1